Louisiana, session 2026, HB1124.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:1703.2(C)(3) and 1703.3(A)(3) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§1703.2. Exemption; optional exemption for business inventory
* * *
C.
* * *
(3) Any parish that elects to phase-in an exemption of one hundred percent
of business inventory from ad valorem tax over a period not to exceed five seven
years shall receive a payment equal to the greater of the amount of ad valorem taxes
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2739 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1124
collected on business inventory within the parish for the 2026 tax year or five
hundred thousand dollars. However, the maximum amount a parish may receive
pursuant to the provisions of this Paragraph shall not exceed ten million dollars.
* * *
§1703.3. Business inventory; partial exemption; percentage of fair market value
adjustment
A.
* * *
(3) The partial exemption reducing the percentage of fair market value
applicable to business inventory shall be evidenced in writing and shall be submitted
to the Louisiana Tax Commission and the appropriate tax assessor within ten fifteen
calendar days of the execution of the agreement between the sheriff, school board,
and the parish governing authority to reduce the percentage of fair market value
applicable to business inventory. The written documentation shall contain the new
percentage of fair market value applicable to business inventory in the parish and
shall indicate the effective date of the reduced percentage. The Louisiana Tax
Commission shall include all written notifications received from parishes indicating
a reduction of the percentage of the fair market value applicable to business
inventory in the commission's annual reports.
* * *
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall be applicable to property tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
Section 3. The provisions of Section 1 of this Act that amend R.S. 47:1703.2(C)(3)
and 1703.3(A)(3) supersede the provisions of Section 1 of Act No. 357 of the 2025 Regular
Session of the Legislature that enact R.S. 47:1703.2(C)(3) and 1703.3(A)(3).
Section 4.(A) Sections 1 and 2 of this Act shall become effective when Section 1 of
Act No. 357 of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature becomes effective.
(B) This Section and Section 3 of this Act shall become effective upon signature by
the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2739 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1124
become law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the
Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the
legislature, this Section and Section 3 of this Act shall become effective on the day following
such approval.